Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.240

Claimant to proceeds of sale.

During the time the estate is held by the agent, or within four years after it is delivered to the county treasury, claim may be made thereto only by the absentee person or his or her legal representative, excepting that if it clearly appears that such person died prior to the decedent in whose estate distribution was made to him or her, but leaving lineal descendants surviving, such lineal descendants may claim. If any claim to the estate is made during the period specified above, the claimant shall forthwith notify the department of revenue in writing of such claim. The court, being first satisfied as to the right of such person to the estate, and after the filing of a clearance from the department of revenue, shall order the agent, or the county treasurer, as the case may be, to forthwith deliver the estate, or the proceeds thereof, if sold, to such person.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2075; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 11; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.240. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 7 s 6; 1917 c 156 s 169; RRS s 1539.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.